Hawaii statutes.
§49-3 Additional powers of counties. (a)
In addition to the powers that it may now have, any county under this chapter
may:

(1) Construct, acquire by gift, purchase, or the
exercise of the right of eminent domain, reconstruct, improve, better, or extend
any undertaking, within or without the county, or partially within or partially
without the county, and acquire by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right
of eminent domain, lands or rights in land or water rights in connection with
the land rights or undertake the establishment and administration of a loan
program as authorized by the law;

(2) Operate and maintain any undertaking and maintain
a loan program as authorized by law and furnish the services, facilities, and
commodities thereof for its own use and for the use of public and private
consumers within or without the territorial boundaries of the county;

(3) Issue its revenue bonds to finance in whole or in
part the cost of the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction,
improvement, betterment, or extension of any undertaking or the establishment
and administration of any loan program as authorized by law;

(4) Impose, prescribe, and collect rates, rentals,
fees, and charges for the use and services of, and the facilities and commodities
furnished by, the undertaking or the use and services of the loan program as
authorized by law, as provided in section 49-10; and

(5) Pledge to the punctual payment of the revenue
bonds and interest thereon or covenant to pay into any special funds from which
any revenue bonds may be payable, all or any portion of the revenue of the
undertaking or loan program or of any part thereof, or the user taxes derived
therefrom, or any combination of both (including improvements, betterments, or
extensions thereto thereafter constructed or acquired) sufficient, among other
things, to pay the revenue bonds and interest thereon as the same shall become
due and create and maintain reasonable reserves therefor.

(b) The governing body of the county in
determining the cost may include:

(1) All costs and estimated costs of the issuance of
the revenue bonds;

(2) All architectural, engineering, inspection,
financial, and legal expenses;

(3) All costs of establishing or administering a loan
program authorized by law;

(4) The cost of causing the payment of the principal
or interest or both of the revenue bonds to be insured or guaranteed;

(5) The initial cost of any support facility obtained
as permitted by section 49-8; and

(6) Interest that is estimated will accrue on the
bonds during the construction or origination period and for six months
thereafter.

(c) Subject to the approval of the governing
body, or in counties with a population of five hundred thousand or more if
authorized by a county charter to issue revenue bonds in its own name, a board
may exercise all or any part of the powers vested in the county pursuant to
this chapter but only with respect to an undertaking or loan program under the
jurisdiction of the board. In the event a board exercises any of the powers
vested in the county pursuant to this chapter, the term governing body as used
in this chapter shall be deemed to mean the board, and the term director of
finance shall be deemed to mean the chief financial officer of the board. [L
1989, c 80, pt of §3; am L Sp 2009, c 31, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next